District of Columbia statutes.
2-225.11

Repealed

Testing of building materials by Bureau of Standards.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 945, ch. 150
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(d), 32 DCR 7396
1981 Ed., § 1-1116.
1973 Ed., § 1-813.